Georgia, session 2025_26, HB233.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
PART I
SECTION 1-1.
The General Assembly finds that:
(1) Making sugarcane syrup has been a part of family farm tradition for generations,
particularly in Georgia;
- 1 -

LC 39 4749S
(2) The increase in production costs, competition from artificial syrups, and the decreasing
number of farmers who still make sugarcane syrup, however, has led some to refer to the
making of sugarcane syrup as a dying art;
(3) Establishing a "National Sugarcane Syrup Day" in Georgia would help to preserve the
art of making sugarcane syrup by honoring those who continue with this longstanding
family farm tradition and by raising public awareness of the differences between natural
sugarcane syrup and artificial syrups;
(4) Designating the fourth Friday in November of each year, the day after Thanksgiving,
as "National Sugarcane Syrup Day" is particularly fitting, as it is not only a time when
families gather and celebrate together, but also a time when some say sugarcane is at its
sweetest in Georgia; and
(5) It is, therefore, abundantly fitting and proper that the State of Georgia appropriately
recognize and honor the family farm tradition of making sugarcane syrup by designating
the fourth Friday in November of each year as "National Sugarcane Syrup Day" in Georgia.
SECTION 1-2.
Chapter 4 of Title 1 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to holidays and
observances, is amended by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"1-4-27.
The fourth Friday in November of each year is designated as 'National Sugarcane Syrup
Day' in Georgia."
PART II
SECTION 2-1.
The General Assembly of Georgia finds and determines that:
- 2 -

LC 39 4749S
(1) Brunswick stew is a rich, thick stew noted for its signature ingredients of meat,
tomatoes, and fresh vegetables, such as sweet corn;
(2) A plaque on an old iron pot in Brunswick, Georgia, declares the first Brunswick stew
was made in it on July 2, 1898, on nearby St. Simons Island; and
(3) Contrary to claims by other states, Georgia, and specifically Brunswick, Georgia, is the
birthplace of Brunswick stew.
SECTION 2-2.
Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state government, is amended
by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"50-3-94.
Brunswick stew is designated as the official Georgia state stew."
PART III
SECTION 3-1.
The General Assembly finds and declares that:
(1) The colorful history and traditions of the State of Georgia are inextricably associated
with the food traditions of corn, and among the many legacies of this proud heritage is the
delicious bread known as cornbread;
(2) Relied upon by indigenous people to sustain themselves, cornbread has transcended
its humble origins to take a place of honor at such events as the Prater's Mill Country Fair
in Whitfield County;
(3) With thousands of participants and visitors, such celebrations include cornbread
cooked on a wood-burning stove and served with collard greens and pinto beans;
- 3 -

LC 39 4749S
(4) Corn is grown, ground, and made into cornmeal at historic mills like Prater's Mill,
Berry College Mill, and Ogeechee River Mill and modern mills like Southeastern Mills and
Logan Turnpike Mill;
(5) Cornmeal is then sold in stores and served in eating establishments throughout the
state, and cornbread is enjoyed by young and old at home and in restaurants;
(6) Cornbread enjoys a singular stature in Georgia history and culture that is rivaled only
by its undeniable appeal as a versatile and satisfying food; and
(7) Accordingly, it is abundantly fitting and proper that cornbread be designated as the
official Georgia state bread so as to fully recognize the importance of this product to this
state.
SECTION 3-2.
Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state government, is amended
by adding a new Code section to read as follows:
"50-3-95.
Cornbread is designated as the official Georgia state bread."
PART IV
SECTION 4-1.
Title 50 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to state government, is amended
by revising Code Section 50-5-84.2, relating to contracting with companies owned by China,
as follows:
"50-5-84.2.
(a) As used in this Code section, the term:
(1) 'Company' means any sole proprietorship, organization, association, corporation,
partnership, joint venture, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited
- 4 -

LC 39 4749S
liability company, or other entity or business association, including all wholly owned
subsidiaries, majority owned subsidiaries, or parent companies, or affiliates of such
entities or business associations, that exists for the purpose of making profit.
(2) 'Foreign country of concern' means a country whose government is designated as a
foreign adversary by the United States Secretary of Commerce pursuant to 15 C.F.R.
Section 7.4 as of January 1, 2025.
(3) 'Government of China' means the People's Republic of China led by the Chinese
Communist Party.
(3)(4) 'Scrutinized company' means any company owned or operated by the government
of China or a foreign country of concern or any company in which the government of
China or a foreign country of concern has an ownership stake.
(b) A scrutinized company shall be ineligible to, and shall not, bid on or submit a proposal
for a contract, directly or through a third-party seller, with a state agency for goods or
services, including, but not limited to, a contract for the procurement or purchase of
computers, printers, connecting cables, or interoperable videoconferencing services used
in connection with an office environment.
100 (c) A state agency shall require a company that submits a bid or proposal with respect to
101 a contract for goods or services to certify that the company is not a scrutinized company.
102 (d) If the Department of Administrative Services determines that a company has submitted
103 a false certification under subsection (c) of this Code section:
104 (1) The company shall be liable for a civil penalty in an amount that is equal to the
105 greater of $250,000.00 or twice the amount of the contract for which a bid or proposal
106 was submitted;
107 (2) The state agency or the Department of Administrative Services shall terminate the
108 contract with the company; and
109 (3) The company shall be ineligible to, and shall not, bid on a state contract."
- 5 -

LC 39 4749S
110 PART V
111 SECTION 5-1.
112 All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
- 6 -